apertium-de-nl.de.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="utf-8"?>
<dictionary>
<alphabet>ÄÖÜäöüßABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
<sdefs>
    <sdef n="apos"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>

    <sdef n="num" 	    c="number"/> 

    <sdef n="subj" 	    c="subject"/> 
    <sdef n="obj" 	    c="object"/> 
    <sdef n="dobj" 	    c="direct object"/>	
    <sdef n="iobj" 	    c="indirect object"/> 

    <sdef n="prn" 	    c="pronoun"/> 

    <sdef n="det" 	    c="determiner"/> 
    <sdef n="ind" 	    c="indefinite"/> 
    <sdef n="def" 	    c="definite"/> 

    <sdef n="n" 	    c="noun"/> 
    <sdef n="np" 	    c="proper noun"/> 

    <sdef n="f" 	    c="feminine"/> 
    <sdef n="m" 	    c="masculine"/> 
    <sdef n="mf" 	    c="masculine/feminine"/> 
    <sdef n="nt" 	    c="neuter"/> 

    <sdef n="sg" 	    c="singular"/> 
    <sdef n="pl" 	    c="plural"/> 
    <sdef n="sp" 	    c="singular/plural"/> 
    <sdef n="unc" 	    c="uncountable"/> 

    <sdef n="loc" 	    c="location - not locative!"/> 

    <sdef n="cnjcoo" 	    c="co-ordinating conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" 	    c="subordinating conjunction"/> 

    <sdef n="pr" 	    c="preposition"/> 

    <sdef n="adv"/>

    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="sint"/>
    <sdef n="pred"/>
    <sdef n="attr"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="comp"/>

    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="acc"/>
    <sdef n="dat"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>

    <sdef n="vbser" 	    c="the verb 'to be'"/> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" 	    c="the verb 'to have'"/> 
    <sdef n="vblex" 	    c="all other regular verbs"/> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" 	    c="modal verbs"/> 

    <sdef n="p1" 	    c="first person"/> 
    <sdef n="p2" 	    c="second person"/>	
    <sdef n="p3" 	    c="third person"/> 

    <sdef n="pri" 	    c="present indicative"/> 
    <sdef n="past" 	    c="past tense (preterite)"/> 
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="guionet">
    <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


 <pardef n="coma">
    <e>
        <p>
         <l>,</l>
         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cometa">
    <e>
        <p>
         <l>'</l>
         <r>'<s n="apos"/></r>
        </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="numeros">
    <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
    <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
     <pardef n="separ">
    <e>
        <re>[¿¡]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
    <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
    <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- Orthography -->
    <pardef n="ae_ä">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ae</l>
          <r>ä</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ä</l>
          <r>ä</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="oe_ö">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>oe</l>
          <r>ö</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ö</l>
          <r>ö</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ue_ü">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ue</l>
          <r>ü</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ü</l>
          <r>ü</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ss_ß">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ss</l>
          <r>ß</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ß</l>
          <r>ß</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Numbers -->

    <pardef n="zwei__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="einund__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>einund</l>
          <r>einund</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zweiund</l>
          <r>zweiund</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dreiund</l>
          <r>dreiund</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vierund</l>
          <r>vierund</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fünfund</l>
          <r>fünfund</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fuenfund</l>
          <r>fünfund</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sechsund</l>
          <r>sechsund</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>siebenund</l>
          <r>siebenund</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>achtund</l>
          <r>achtund</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>neunund</l>
          <r>neunund</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="und__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="als__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Prepositions -->

    <pardef n="mit__pr"> <!-- Dative -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="durch__pr"> <!-- Accusative -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="an__pr"> <!-- Dative/Accusative -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="außerhalb__pr"> <!-- Genitive -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef> 

    <!-- Articles -->

    <pardef n="ein__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="aber"><i>aber</i><par n="und__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="denn"><i>denn</i><par n="und__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="oder"><i>oder</i><par n="und__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="sondern"><i>sondern</i><par n="und__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="und"><i>und</i><par n="und__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="bevor"><i>bevor</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="bis"><i>bis</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="da"><i>da</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="indem"><i>indem</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="nachdem"><i>nachdem</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="obwohl"><i>obwohl</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="weil"><i>weil</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="wie"><i>wie</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="wohin"><i>wohin</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="worin"><i>worin</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="sodass"><i>sodass</i><par n="als__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="zwei"><i>zwei</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
    <e lm="vier"><i>vier</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sechs"><i>sechs</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
    <e lm="acht"><i>acht</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
    <e lm="zehn"><i>zehn</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
    <e lm="zwölf"><i>zwölf</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
    <e lm="vierzehn"><i>vierzehn</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sechszehn"><i>sechszehn</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
    <e lm="zwanzig"><par n="einund__num"/><i>zwanzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
    <e lm="dreißig"><par n="einund__num"/><i>dreißig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
    <e lm="vierzig"><par n="einund__num"/><i>vierzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
    <e lm="fünfzig"><par n="einund__num"/><i>fünfzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sechzig"><par n="einund__num"/><i>sechzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
    <e lm="siebzig"><par n="einund__num"/><i>siebzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
    <e lm="achtzig"><par n="einund__num"/><i>achtzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
    <e lm="neunzig"><par n="einund__num"/><i>neunzig</i><par n="zwei__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ein"><i>ein</i><par n="ein__det"/></e>
    <e lm="aus"><i>aus</i><par n="mit__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="außer"><i>außer</i><par n="mit__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="bei"><i>bei</i><par n="mit__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="gegenüber"><i>gegenüber</i><par n="mit__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="mit"><i>mit</i><par n="mit__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="nach"><i>nach</i><par n="mit__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="seit"><i>seit</i><par n="mit__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="von"><i>von</i><par n="mit__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="zu"><i>zu</i><par n="mit__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="durch"><i>durch</i><par n="durch__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="entlang"><i>entlang</i><par n="durch__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="für"><i>für</i><par n="durch__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="gegen"><i>gegen</i><par n="durch__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ohne"><i>ohne</i><par n="durch__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="um"><i>um</i><par n="durch__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="wider"><i>wider</i><par n="durch__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="an"><i>an</i><par n="an__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="auf"><i>auf</i><par n="an__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="hinter"><i>hinter</i><par n="an__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="in"><i>in</i><par n="an__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="neben"><i>neben</i><par n="an__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="über"><i>über</i><par n="an__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="unter"><i>unter</i><par n="an__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="vor"><i>vor</i><par n="an__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="zwischen"><i>zwischen</i><par n="an__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="beiderseits"><i>beiderseits</i><par n="außerhalb__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="diesseits"><i>diesseits</i><par n="außerhalb__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="hinsichtlich"><i>hinsichtlich</i><par n="außerhalb__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="infolge"><i>infolge</i><par n="außerhalb__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="innerhalb"><i>innerhalb</i><par n="außerhalb__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="jenseits"><i>jenseits</i><par n="außerhalb__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="statt"><i>statt</i><par n="außerhalb__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="trotz"><i>trotz</i><par n="außerhalb__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="wegen"><i>wegen</i><par n="außerhalb__pr"/></e>
    <e>
      <par n="separa"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="numeros"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="coma"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="cometa"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="paresq"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="pardret"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="guionet"/>
    </e>
